Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201723-3408
Public defender; second attorney authorized; when; fees.

In the event that the contracting attorney is appointed to represent an individual charged with a Class I or Class IA felony, the contracting attorney shall immediately apply to the district court for appointment of a second attorney to assist in the case. Upon application from the contracting attorney, the district court shall appoint another attorney with substantial felony trial experience to assist the contracting attorney in the case. Application for fees for the attorney appointed by the district court shall be made to the district court judge who shall allow reasonable fees. Once approved by the court, such fees shall be paid by the county board.

Laws 1986, LB 885, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1828;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 2;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 23-3408 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 2, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.